Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2,123
Real estate closing agents; regulating entities; rules and regulations.

Each state regulating entity may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and issue such orders as are necessary or desirable to carry out section 76-2,122. Each regulating entity may inspect, examine, and audit the books and records of real estate closing agents under its jurisdiction who conduct real estate closings. The regulating entity may require reimbursement from the real estate closing agent for the expenses of such inspection, examination, or audit.

Laws 1994, LB 1275, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 217, § 46.